src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_adverbs.lexc
LEXICON ADVLoc_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVLoc_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc                                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreadverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc                                                     !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVLoc, Class: ADVLoc, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+ADVLoc: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan                                                     !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVMan_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan                                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_PrefixBoundary
0:%<%< PreadverbRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan                                                     !
!         Stems                                                                !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary
0:%>%> ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan, Class: ADVMan                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan, Class: ADVMan                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVMan, Class: ADVMan, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+ADVMan: EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVNeg                                                     !
!         Prefixes                                                             !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVNeg_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ ADVNeg_PrefixBoundary ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: ADVNeg                                                     !
!         Morpheme boundary between prefix and stem                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ADVLoc_Stems
aabitawinaaganens ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aagwaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
aasamoonag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaamaakwaa ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agaamindeshkwaand ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agidaajiwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
agidikwam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
akeyaa ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
anaamiindim ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ashoodagaam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awashishkode ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
awasinagakekana:awasinagakekanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
babesho:babeshow2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
bigwajaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinji-gizhaabikizigan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
biinjijaan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
bimijaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
dibishkoojaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyedawaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawagaam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
eyiidawishkwaand ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
gichi-waasa:gichi-waasaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
giiwitaayi'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ishkwaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ishpimiing ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigadoopowinaak ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigi-baawitig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
jiigisag ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mayaawindib ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
megwebiiway ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
midaasonik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mitaabik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
mizhishawikwam ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawaatig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawi-minis ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
naawikana:naawikanaw2 ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nabane-aya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
namanjinakeya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
niisajiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nisawaatig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
nisonik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogidaatig ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogijaya'ii ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ogijiing ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
ondaasajiw ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
wagidaajiwan ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
wayekwaandeg ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
zhagashkaanaamik ADVLoc_Class=ADVLoc_Boundary ;
LEXICON ADVMan_Stems
aangwaamis ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
aaniindanaapii ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
agwaamas ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
anwaakam ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
awanjish ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ayaanjigo:ayaanjigow2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
baapish ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
bakaan ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
bebekaa ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
biigiskaadakamig ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
biinizikaa ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
bizhishig ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
daabida:daabidaw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
debinaak ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
dibinawe ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
eshkwaa ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gaagizhwiin ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gagwaanisagakamig ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ganage ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gichi-weweni:gichi-weweniw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
giigaski:giigaskiw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gikinawaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ginzhizha:ginzhizhaw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gizhinzha:gizhinzhaw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
gwayanjish ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
indawaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ishkwekamig ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
maamakaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
maamawi:maamawiw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
maawiin ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
mamaazhiinzh ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
memeshkod ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
memindage ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
meshkod ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
meta:metaw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
miinooj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
na'egaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
naabisa:naabisaw2 ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
naanabem ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
nabaawish ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ndawaa ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
nenaapaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
nindawaa ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
nizhike ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
waawiizh ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
wawiiyazh ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
wenipazh ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
wewiib ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
ziibiskaaj ADVMan_Class=ADVMan_Boundary ;
